Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-709
Certificate of incorporation; effect.

Upon the filing of articles of incorporation with the Secretary of State, the corporate existence of the corporation shall begin. The certificate of incorporation shall be conclusive evidence, except as against the state, that all conditions precedent required to be performed by the incorporators have been complied with, and that the corporation has been incorporated.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 9, p. 206;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-809;

R.S.1943, § 70-709.